Utah statutes.
19-4-111.2.   Provision of fluoridated water -- Emergency circumstances.
(1)  A public water system that is simultaneously supplying water to a
municipality or county that approved fluoridation in accordance with Section
19-4-111 and a municipality or county that has not approved fluoridation may
provide water from its fluoridated inventory to a municipality or county that
has not approved fluoridation if:
(a)  as a result of a short-term emergency, the only water available is from
the public water system's fluoridated inventory;
(b)  the public water system ceases providing fluoridated water to the
municipality or county that has not approved fluoridation in accordance with
Subsection 19-4-111(2) in a time consistent with repair times following best
industrial practice; and
(c)  where feasible provide prompt notice to the affected area.
(2) (a)  A resident of an affected area that does not wish to receive
fluoridated water during an emergency may contact the public water system to
have delivery of fluoridated water to their residence or business terminated.
(b)  The resident shall determine when to resume delivery of water and shall
contact the public water system to have delivery of water resumed.
